Utah statutes.
63A-1-108.   Powers and duties of other agencies assigned to executive director.

Powers and duties assigned by other provisions of this title to the Division of Finance, the State Building Board, or other agencies or divisions of the department, and not specifically assigned by this chapter, shall be assigned to the executive director with the approval of the governor.

